Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
General Provisions
196.167.
Transfer of employees, property, and records associated with inmate education from the Kentucky Community and Technical College System to the department — Employee benefits.

Effective July 1, 2010, faculty and staff of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System who:

Are engaged in providing educational services and support to inmates at institutions; and

Exercise the option in subsection (4) of this section;

Employees transferred pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall retain:

Their salaries and leave time balances accumulated as of the transfer date;

For purposes of determining leave time accumulation, the date of initial employment with a state agency or a postsecondary educational institution, whichever is earlier; and

For purposes of calculating retirement and retiree health benefits and contributions, the earlier of the date of initial participation in:

A state-administered retirement system if the employee has participated or is participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System or the Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System; or

A defined contribution plan that meets requirements of 26 U.S.C. sec. 403(b), for employees of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System.

Employees exercising their option under subsection (4) of this section may elect to be covered under KRS Chapter 18A and receive:

All rights and benefits provided to other employees in the department; and

Their choice of retirement benefits under:

The Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System; or

Hazardous duty retirement benefits under the Kentucky Employees Retirement System with hazardous duty contributions and coverage beginning July 1, 2010. The hazardous duty retirement benefits shall be calculated in accordance with KRS 61.510 to 61.705.

Employees of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System engaged in providing educational services and support to inmates at institutions shall choose whether to remain in their present employment and be assigned to the department to continue providing these services, or become an employee of the department under the terms of this section. Employees shall make their choice on or before June 15, 2010, and shall have access to counseling prior to June 15, 2010, by representatives of the department, the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, applicable retirement systems, and the Personnel Cabinet concerning the effect that choosing employment with the department would have on the employee. If an employee does not make a choice on or before June 15, 2010, that employee shall be deemed to have chosen to exercise the option to become an employee of the department with retirement benefits described in subsection (3)(b)2. of this section.

Effective July 1, 2010, all instructional supplies, equipment, funds, and records of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System associated with the provision of educational services and support to inmates at institutions shall be transferred to the department along with all financial and management oversight responsibility and liability for these programs.

shall be transferred to the Department of Corrections along with the funding associated with those employees. The Personnel Cabinet shall assist the department in implementing the transfer of employees according to this section.

Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to provide additional service credit for the employee prior to the transfer date other than what has been credited to the appropriate retirement system.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 104, § 1, effective April 8, 2010.

196.170.
Oath of superintendents and receivers. [Repealed.]

196.171.
Corrections personnel to take educational course on AIDS.

The Department of Corrections shall develop an educational course on the human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome approved by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services of not more than four (4) hours for the instruction of corrections personnel who have day-to-day contact with incarcerated persons and personnel who may be expected to respond to crisis situations. The literature and training curriculum shall include information of known modes of transmission and methods of controlling and preventing these diseases with an emphasis on appropriate behavior and attitude change. The training may be part of any continuing education program.

All persons referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall successfully complete the training required. Any person holding the position referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall not fill that position for more than one (1) year without successful completion of the required training. If a person does not successfully complete the required training within the time specified, he shall be suspended from further service until he successfully completes the required training.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 443, § 33, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 33, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 130, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 170, effective June 20, 2005.

196.173.
Pregnant inmates housed in jail, penitentiary, local or state correctional or detention facility, residential center, or reentry center — Permissible and impermissible restraints.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an inmate housed in a jail, penitentiary, or local or state correctional or detention facility, residential center, or reentry center who is known to be pregnant shall be restrained solely with handcuffs in front of her body unless further restraint is required to protect herself or others.

Except in an extraordinary circumstance, no inmate who is known to be pregnant shall be restrained during labor, during transport to a medical facility or birthing center for delivery, or during postpartum recovery.
(2) (a)

Except in an extraordinary circumstance, no inmate who is known to be pregnant shall be restrained during labor, during transport to a medical facility or birthing center for delivery, or during postpartum recovery.

As used in this subsection, “extraordinary circumstance” means that reasonable grounds exist to believe the inmate presents an immediate and credible:

Serious threat of hurting herself, staff, or others; or

Risk of escape that cannot be reasonably minimized through any method other than restraints.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 115, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

196.174.
Housing of inmate known to be pregnant or in immediate post-partum period — Definition.

No inmate housed in a jail, penitentiary, or local or state correctional or detention facility, residential center, or reentry center who is known to be pregnant or in the immediate postpartum period shall be placed in restrictive housing, in administrative segregation, or in solitary confinement for medical observation. This prohibition shall not include placing an inmate in a cell or hospital room by herself.

As used in this section, “immediate postpartum period” means the six (6) week period following childbirth by the inmate. However, the six (6) week period may be extended by a physician should the inmate experience birth-related complications.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 85, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

196.175.
Pregnant inmate — Access to community-based programs — Social worker to discuss options for care, feeding, and placement of infant — Inmate's access to telephone — Facility to provide nutrition and hygiene-related products for care of infant free of charge to indigent inmate.

For any inmate housed in a jail, penitentiary, or local or state correctional or detention facility, residential center, or reentry center who is known to be pregnant:

The facility shall provide the inmate notice of, access to, and a written application for community-based programs serving pregnant, birthing, or lactating inmates. At a minimum, the notice shall contain how to qualify for the programs as well as timelines for applying and the process for appealing a denial. If a community-based program accepts the inmate but is denied access to the facility, the facility shall provide to the inmate, in writing within fifteen (15) days of the request, the safety or security concerns for the inmate, infant, public, or staff that led to the denial.

The facility shall refer the inmate to a social worker who shall:

Discuss with the inmate the options available for feeding, placement, and care of the infant, including the benefits of lactation;

Provide the inmate access to a phone to contact family regarding placement of the infant; and

Oversee the placement of the infant.

For up to seventy-two (72) hours after the birth, the facility shall ensure that:

The infant is allowed to remain with the inmate, unless a medical professional determines that doing so would pose a health or safety risk to the inmate or infant; and

The inmate has access to nutritional or hygiene-related products necessary to care for the infant, including but not limited to diapers. Such products shall be provided free of charge to indigent inmates.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 85, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

196.176.
Annual report on restricted housing of inmates to Legislative Research Commission and Judiciary Committee — Report to be published on Legislative Research Commission’s Web site.

The department shall provide an annual restricted housing report to the Legislative Research Commission and the Judiciary Committee by January 31. The report shall include for the preceding year:

The age, gender, and ethnicity of every inmate placed in restricted housing;

The reason each inmate was placed in restricted housing; and

The dates each inmate was placed in and released from restricted housing.

The annual restricted housing report shall be published on the Legislative Research Commission’s Web site.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 85, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

196.180.
Duties of warden — Removal — Expungement of dismissed or voided disciplinary reports.

The warden shall have the general management of the institution, and the inmates thereof, subject to the administrative regulations of the Department of Corrections, and he or she shall devote his or her entire time to the duties of his or her office.

The warden of each institution shall be held responsible for the management of his or her institution and shall be subject to removal at any time by the commissioner.

The warden of each Department of Corrections institution shall expunge inmate prison disciplinary reports that have been dismissed or otherwise ordered void, and shall further remove any reference to dismissed or voided disciplinary reports from inmate records.

History.
216aa-11, 216aa-20: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 50, § 32; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 401, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 211, § 34, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

196.190.
Duties of receiver.

The receiver shall receive all goods and supplies purchased for the institution, take charge of them, see that they correspond with the bills accompanying them, in character, quality, and quantity, and distribute them to each department of the institution as the warden directs by written order. The receiver shall open an account with each department in a book for that purpose, charging therein the cost price for all goods so received and distributed. The books shall be open at all times for inspection by the warden, the commissioner, the secretary, the Governor, a committee of the Legislature, or any person appointed by either for examination.

History.
216aa-14: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 344, § 14, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 35, effective July 14, 1992.

196.200.
Qualifications of superintendent and employes in institutions. [Repealed.]

196.210.
Members of board not to recommend employees — Officers to be selected for merit.

No advisory member of the board shall recommend or urge that any person shall be employed in any institution.

All officers and employees of the Department of Corrections shall be selected for merit and fitness only and, with the exception of persons employed for special or temporary service, shall give all of their time to the service of the Department of Corrections.

History.
216aa-19, 216aa-20: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 15, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 36, effective July 14, 1992.

196.220.
Employees in institutions exempt from attendance as witnesses.

No officer or employee of any institution shall be required to give personal attendance as a witness in any civil suit out of the county in which the institution is situated, but his deposition shall be taken in lieu thereof.

History.
216aa-22.

196.230.
Officers not to sell to institutions — Additional compensation and gifts forbidden.

No officer in the department shall sell anything to any institution under the control of the Department of Corrections, or make any contract, in which he is interested, with the institution.

Officers and employees shall not be entitled to receive any compensation for their services other than the salary paid them by the state.

No officer or employee of the Department of Corrections or any of the institutions under its control shall accept any fee or gift for any purpose from any person who has at the time or has had a contract to do anything connected with the Department of Corrections or an institution.

History.
216aa-7, 216aa-17, 216aa-21: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 16, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 37, effective July 14, 1992.

196.240.
Religious instruction and ministration for persons confined. [Repealed.]

196.245.
Commissioner may permit or prohibit smoking by inmates.

The commissioner may permit or prohibit the practice of smoking by the inmates of the penal institutions, regardless of the age of the inmates, when he believes the regulation will enhance or improve the discipline of the inmates of these institutions.

History.
Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 139, § 1; 1962, ch. 106, Art. X, § 7; 1980, ch. 188, § 145, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 344, § 17, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 38, effective July 14, 1992.

196.250.
Charitable organizations not to solicit funds out of county without license. [Repealed.]

196.260.
Department may investigate charitable institutions. [Repealed.]

196.270.
Centralized canteen operation — Management — Use of proceeds.

There shall be established and maintained within the Department of Corrections a centralized canteen operation which shall be incorporated and self-supporting. Each institution administered by the department and each institution which operates under a contract between the state and a private provider shall participate in the canteen operation. The directors of the canteen shall be as follows: the commissioner of the Department of Corrections, the deputy commissioner of Adult Institutions, the executive director of the Division of Administrative Services, and the wardens of all state and private correctional institutions. All profits from the canteen, including the sale of handicrafts made by inmates to the general public, shall be used exclusively for the benefit of the inmates of the department. The directors of the canteen may consolidate the assets of the existing state and private canteens for this purpose and to employ the staff and inmates necessary to efficiently manage the canteen. Assets and profits from the operation of private canteens shall be accounted for separately and utilized exclusively for the benefit of inmates in private prisons.

History.
Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 170, § 1; Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1978, ch. 155, § 120, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 344, § 18, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 106, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 497, § 28, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 39, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 227, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 406, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

196.280.
Notification of release of person from penitentiary, facility for youthful offenders, regional jail, or county jail — Escape.

The Department of Corrections shall provide or contract with a private entity to provide to members of the public who have made a notification request, notification of the release of an incarcerated person from a penitentiary, as defined in KRS 197.010, facility for youthful offenders, regional jail, or county jail. The warden, jailer, or chief administrator, or a person designated by the warden, jailer, or chief administrator, of a penitentiary, facility for youthful offenders, regional jail, or county jail, shall make available to the Department of Corrections, or any private entity under contract with the Department of Corrections, the information necessary to implement this section in a timely manner and before the release of any incarcerated person from the penitentiary, facility for youthful offenders, regional jail, or county jail. The Department of Corrections or the private entity under contract with the Department of Corrections shall be responsible for retrieving the information and notifying the requester in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the Department of Corrections.
(1) (a)

The Department of Corrections shall provide or contract with a private entity to provide to members of the public who have made a notification request, notification of the release of an incarcerated person from a penitentiary, as defined in KRS 197.010, facility for youthful offenders, regional jail, or county jail. The warden, jailer, or chief administrator, or a person designated by the warden, jailer, or chief administrator, of a penitentiary, facility for youthful offenders, regional jail, or county jail, shall make available to the Department of Corrections, or any private entity under contract with the Department of Corrections, the information necessary to implement this section in a timely manner and before the release of any incarcerated person from the penitentiary, facility for youthful offenders, regional jail, or county jail. The Department of Corrections or the private entity under contract with the Department of Corrections shall be responsible for retrieving the information and notifying the requester in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the Department of Corrections.

If an incarcerated person escapes from any penitentiary, facility for youthful offenders, regional jail, or county jail, the warden, jailer, or chief administrator, or a person designated by the warden, jailer, or chief administrator, shall immediately provide the information necessary to implement this section.

If, upon a hearing, a court releases an incarcerated person and the incarcerated person does not return to the penitentiary, facility for youthful offenders, regional jail, or county jail, the warden, jailer, or chief administrator, or a person designated by the warden, jailer, or chief administrator, shall provide the information necessary to implement this section as soon as practicable.

The Department of Corrections shall promulgate administrative regulations for the implementation of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 375, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 400, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 182, § 20, effective July 12, 2006.

196.281.
Documentation provided to prisoners upon release — Issuance of certificate of employability — Eligibility, contents, and revocation.

When a prisoner is released, the department shall issue to that prisoner, with the prisoner’s consent, documents regarding all of the following:

The prisoner’s criminal history in Kentucky;

The prisoner’s institutional history, including all of the following:

Any record of major disciplinary violations;

Whether the prisoner successfully completed programming approved by the department;

Whether the prisoner obtained a high school equivalency diploma or other educational degree prior to incarceration, to the extent known or verifiable by the department;

Whether the prisoner obtained a high school equivalency diploma or other educational degree while incarcerated;

The prisoner’s work record prior to incarceration, including past employment and skills, to the extent known or verifiable by the department, and to the extent the department is technologically capable of providing this information; and

The prisoner’s institutional work record, including skills obtained through any job training or programming provided by the department; and

Other information considered relevant by the department.

When a prisoner is released, the department may, in conjunction with the Transportation Cabinet, issue to that prisoner an operator’s license or personal identification card that is a voluntary travel ID document pursuant to KRS 186.417.

In addition to the documents provided under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the department shall issue a certificate of employability to a prisoner if all of the following apply:

The prisoner achieved one (1) or both of the following:

While incarcerated, successfully earned one (1) or more of the following:

An educational credit pursuant to KRS 197.045(1)(a)2.;

A program completion credit pursuant to KRS 197.045(1)(a)3.; or

A work-for-time credit pursuant to KRS 197.047; or

Prior to incarceration, earned a High School Equivalency Diploma, a high school diploma, a college degree, certification from a vocational or technical education program that the program was completed, or a diploma or degree from a correspondence postsecondary education program approved by the department;

The prisoner received no major disciplinary violations during the year immediately preceding his or her release; and

The prisoner received a score or level of competence as determined by the department on a job skills assessment test administered by the department or jail.

A certificate of employability issued pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall:

Be issued to the prisoner when he or she is released from a correctional facility;

Be on a form provided by the department;

Be valid unless revoked by the department; and

Not create relief from:

A requirement to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.510;

A driver’s license, commercial driver’s license, or probationary license suspension, cancellation, or revocation;

A restriction on employment as a prosecutor or law enforcement officer; or

The denial, ineligibility, or automatic suspension of a health care professional’s license due to a substance use disorder.

The department shall revoke the certificate of employability provided under this section of any individual who is convicted of a felony after receiving a certificate of employability.
(5) (a)

The department shall revoke the certificate of employability provided under this section of any individual who is convicted of a felony after receiving a certificate of employability.

The department shall provide an individual whose certificate of employability has been revoked under this subsection an opportunity to file a grievance through the department’s prisoner grievance system. The revocation of a certificate of employability is effective when the individual is notified of the revocation.

The revocation of a certificate of employability does not affect the right of an employer to rely on the validity of the certificate of employability unless the employer knew before the individual was employed that the certificate of employability was fraudulent.

An individual shall not intentionally state or otherwise represent that he or she has a valid certificate of employability issued by the department knowing that the statement or representation is false. An individual who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Upon request, the department shall confirm whether a certificate of employability has been issued to a named individual and whether the certificate is valid at the time of the inquiry and at the time of the department’s response to that inquiry.

The department is not civilly liable for damages based upon its decision to issue or deny issuance of a certificate of employability to any prisoner or for revoking or failing to revoke a certificate of employability issued to any prisoner.

In a judicial or administrative proceeding alleging negligence or other fault, a certificate of employability issued to an individual under this section may be introduced as evidence of a person’s due care in hiring, retaining, licensing, leasing to, admitting to a school or program, or otherwise transacting business or engaging in activity with the individual to whom the certificate of employability was issued if the person knew of the certificate at the time of the alleged negligence or other fault.
(9) (a)

In a judicial or administrative proceeding alleging negligence or other fault, a certificate of employability issued to an individual under this section may be introduced as evidence of a person’s due care in hiring, retaining, licensing, leasing to, admitting to a school or program, or otherwise transacting business or engaging in activity with the individual to whom the certificate of employability was issued if the person knew of the certificate at the time of the alleged negligence or other fault.

In any proceeding on a claim against an employer for negligent hiring, a certificate of employability issued to an individual under this section may be a defense for the employer as to the claim if the employer knew of the certificate at the time of the alleged negligence, except in cases where the employer knew or should have known the employee should not be hired for the position due to the nature of his or her history, including criminal history.

The department shall notify incoming prisoners of the possibility to earn a certificate of employability.

The department shall submit an annual report no later than September 1 of each year to the Governor and the General Assembly, which shall include the number of certificates of employability issued in the preceding twelve (12) months, the rate of recidivism among released prisoners previously issued certificates of employability, and any other information the department deems appropriate to include.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 182, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

196.282.
Resumé writing.

As part of a life skills program that includes curriculum on employment provided to prisoners, the department shall assist prisoners in preparing and writing resumés summarizing their past employment and skills. The department shall assist prisoners in obtaining records or other documents necessary for this purpose.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 182, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

196.285.
Intensive secured substance abuse recovery program.

The department shall develop an intensive secured substance abuse recovery program utilizing existing resources or by contract to house and care for persons suffering from substance abuse who have been charged with a felony offense.

The program shall accept persons referred to it under KRS 533.250 and 533.251.

Persons may agree to be ordered into the program for a period of not less than ninety (90) days and not more than three hundred sixty-five (365) days. No person shall be involuntarily ordered into the program, a commitment shall not occur before the court has considered an evaluation of the defendant’s treatment needs and conducted a hearing where the defendant may appear with counsel with an opportunity to present evidence on his or her own behalf, and persons in the program may petition the court to review the program’s determination as to the length of time the person is to remain in the program or to issue an order to leave the program, which the court shall grant upon request, at any time. However, that departure shall constitute a material breach of any agreement to hold the person’s case in abeyance or of the person’s pretrial diversion agreement. The court shall revoke a defendant’s program commitment over the defendant’s objection prior to the expiration of the commitment period only pursuant to an order of the committing court issued after the court has conducted a hearing on the matter where the defendant may appear with counsel and present evidence on his or her behalf.

The department shall locate the program in a secure facility with security standards comparable to those found in a minimum security correctional institution operated by the department.

The program shall be capable of concurrently housing no fewer than two hundred (200) persons. The department shall have regulatory authority, when the program is at or near capacity, to prioritize admissions to the program.

The program’s recovery component shall be designed to serve the committed person’s substance abuse condition, and to provide the person with the skills and training needed to prevent the person from engaging in substance abuse upon release from the program. The program shall provide each person leaving the program with an aftercare plan, which shall include a referral to a local substance abuse provider capable of providing a level of continuing substance abuse care appropriate to the released person’s needs. In designing the program, the department shall consult with and may contract with the Division of Behavioral Health.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 96, § 1, effective March 24, 2009.

196.286.
Measurement and documentation of cost savings from 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 2, secs. 5 to 22 — Average cost of incarceration — Savings to benefit treatment programs — Budget requests and enactments.

The department shall measure and document cost savings resulting from amendments to or creation of statutes in KRS Chapter 218A contained in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 2, secs. 5 to 22. Measured and documented savings shall be reinvested or distributed as provided in this section.

The Department of Corrections shall establish a baseline for measurement using the average number of inmates incarcerated at each type of penitentiary as defined in KRS 197.010 and at local jails in fiscal year 2010-2011.

The department shall determine the average cost of incarceration for each type of penitentiary as defined in KRS 197.010 and for local jails, including health care costs, transportation costs, and other related costs, for one (1) inmate for one (1) year for the immediately preceding fiscal year.

Beginning with the budget request for the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium, savings shall be estimated using the baseline established in subsection (2) of this section to determine the estimated average reduction of inmates due to the implementation of amendments to or creation of statutes in KRS Chapter 218A contained in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 2, secs. 5 to 22 and multiplied by the appropriate average cost determined in subsection (3) of this section.

The estimated amount of savings shall be used solely for expanding and enhancing treatment programs that employ evidence-based or promising practices designed to reduce the likelihood of future criminal behavior, which shall include treatment programs at existing facilities as outlined in KRS 196.287.

The amount of savings shall be estimated each year of the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium, and for each year of each fiscal biennium thereafter, as specified in subsection (4) of this section.

In submitting its budget request for the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the department shall estimate the amount of savings measured under this section, and shall request the amount necessary to distribute or allocate those savings as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

In enacting the budget for the department, beginning in the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the General Assembly shall determine the estimated amount necessary for reinvestment in programs and initiatives as provided by subsection (5) of this section, based upon projected savings as measured by this section, and shall ensure that appropriations to the department are sufficient to meet the funding requirements of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 23, effective June 8, 2011.

196.287.
Portion of savings identified in KRS 196.286 to be used to expand treatment programs in existing state penal institutions.

The department shall use a portion of the savings identified in KRS 196.286 to expand treatment programs at its existing state penal institutions, including the expansion or creation of treatment programs at facilities that are currently being underutilized if those facilities are appropriate locations for treatment programs or could be modified easily to accommodate treatment programs.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 24, effective June 8, 2011.

196.288.
Measurement and documentation of cost savings resulting from 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 2 — Reinvestment or distribution of savings — Determination of average cost of services — Budget allocations.

The department shall measure and document cost savings resulting from amendments to or creation of statutes in KRS Chapters 27A, 196, 197, 431, 439, 532, 533, and 534 contained in 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 2. Measured and documented savings shall be reinvested or distributed as provided in this section.

The department shall establish a baseline for measurement using the average number of inmates incarcerated at each type of penitentiary as defined in KRS 197.010 and at local jails in fiscal year 2010-2011.

The department shall determine the average cost of:

Incarceration for each type of penitentiary as defined in KRS 197.010 and for local jails, including health care costs, transportation costs, and other related costs, for one (1) inmate for one (1) year for the immediately preceding fiscal year;

Providing probation and parole services for one (1) parolee for one (1) year for the immediately preceding fiscal year; and

Reentry services and peer support as a condition of parole for those with opiate addiction and other substance abuse disorders.

Beginning with the budget request for the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium, savings shall be estimated from the baseline established in subsection (2) of this section as follows:

The estimated average reduction of inmates due to mandatory reentry supervision as required by KRS 439.3406 multiplied by the appropriate average cost as determined in subsection (3)(a) of this section;

The estimated average reduction of inmates due to accelerated parole hearings as required by KRS 439.340 multiplied by the appropriate average cost as determined in subsection (3)(a) of this section;

The estimated average increase of parolees due to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection multiplied by the average cost as determined in subsection (3)(b) of this section; and

The estimated average reduction of parolees due to parole credit for good behavior as provided in KRS 439.345 multiplied by the average cost as determined in subsection (3)(b) of this section.

The following amounts shall be allocated or distributed from the estimated amount of savings that would otherwise remain in the general fund:

Twenty-five percent (25%) shall be distributed to the local corrections assistance fund established by KRS 441.207;

Fifty percent (50%) shall be distributed for the following purposes:

To the department to provide or to contract for the provision of substance abuse treatment in county jails, regional jails, or other local detention centers that employ evidence-based practices in behavioral health treatment or medically assisted treatment for nonstate inmates with opiate addiction or other substance abuse disorders;

For KY-ASAP programs operating under KRS Chapter 15A in county jails or in facilities under the supervision of county jails that employ evidence-based behavioral health treatment or medically assisted treatment for inmates with opiate addiction or other substance abuse disorders;

To KY-ASAP to provide supplemental grant funding to community mental health centers for the purpose of offering additional substance abuse treatment resources through programs that employ evidence-based behavioral health treatment or medically assisted treatment;

To KY-ASAP to address neonatal abstinence syndrome by providing supplemental grant funding to community substance abuse treatment providers to offer residential treatment services to pregnant women through programs that employ evidence-based behavioral health treatment or medically assisted treatment;

To provide supplemental funding for traditional KY-ASAP substance abuse programming under KRS Chapter 15A;

To the department for the purchase of FDA-approved medication-assisted treatment products as a component of evidence-based treatment for inmates with opioid dependence, opioid use disorder, or other substance abuse disorders, for use in substance abuse treatment programs operated or supervised by the department. In purchasing such FDA-approved products, the department shall consider products and treatments that may minimize the risk of diversion;

To the Department of Public Advocacy to provide supplemental funding to the Social Worker Program for the purpose of creating additional social worker positions to develop individualized alternative sentencing plans; and

To the Prosecutors Advisory Council to enhance the use of rocket docket prosecutions in controlled substance cases; and

In enacting the budget for the department and the judicial branch, beginning in the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the General Assembly shall:

Determine the estimated amount necessary for reinvestment in:

Expanded treatment programs and expanded probation and parole services provided by or through the department; and

Additional pretrial services and drug court case specialists provided by or through the Administrative Office of the Courts; and

Shall allocate and appropriate sufficient amounts to fully fund these reinvestment programs.

The amount of savings shall be estimated each year of the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium, and for each year of each fiscal biennium thereafter, as specified in subsection (4) of this section.

In submitting its budget request for the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the department shall estimate the amount of savings measured under this section and shall request the amount necessary to distribute or allocate those savings as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(7) (a)

In submitting its budget request for the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the department shall estimate the amount of savings measured under this section and shall request the amount necessary to distribute or allocate those savings as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

In submitting its budget request for the 2012-2014 fiscal biennium and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the judicial branch shall request the amount necessary to distribute or allocate those savings as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 68, effective June 8, 2011; 2015 ch. 66, § 3, effective March 25, 2015; 2017 ch. 167, § 14, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 61, § 2, effective April 2, 2018.